pt-PT: Superfície de jogo de andebol: Praia; Interior; Interior e exterior; Exterior; Outro
pt-BR: Superfície de jogo de handebol: Areia; Quadra coberta; Quadra coberta e descoberta; Quadra descoberta; Outra
vi: Mặt sân chơi bóng ném: Bãi biển; Trong nhà; Trong nhà và ngoài trời; Ngoài trời; Khác
bg-BG: Игрална повърхност за хандбал: Плаж; На закрито; На закрито и открито; На открито; Друго
hu: Kézilabda játékfelülete: Strand; Beltéri; Beltéri és kültéri; Kültéri; Egyéb
th: พื้นสนามสำหรับเล่นแฮนด์บอล: ชายหาด; ในร่ม; ในร่มและกลางแจ้ง; กลางแจ้ง; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Suprafață de joc de handbal: Plajă; În interior; Interior și exterior; În aer liber; Altele
tr: Hentbol oyun yüzeyi: Plaj; Kapalı alan; Kapalı ve açık alan; Açık alan; Diğer
sv: Handbollsspelyta: Strand; Inomhus; Inomhus och utomhus; Utomhus; Övrigt
hr-HR: Površina za igranje rukometa: Pijesak; Zatvoreni teren; Zatvoreni i otvoreni teren; Otvoreni teren; Ostalo
da: Spilleoverflade til håndbold: Strand; Indendørs; Indendørs og udendørs; Udendørs; Andet
nl: Handbal speeloppervlak: Strand; Binnen; Binnen en buiten; Buiten; Overig
el: Επιφάνεια παιχνιδιού χάντμπολ: Παραλία; Εσωτερικού χώρου; Εσωτερικού και εξωτερικού χώρου; Εξωτερικού χώρου; Άλλο
sk-SK: Hracia plocha hádzanárskej lopty: Pláž; Interiér; Interiér a exteriér; Exteriér; Iné
sl-SI: Igralna površina za rokomet: Mivka; Dvorana; Dvorana in zunaj; Na prostem; Drugo
it: campo da gioco per pallamano: Spiaggia; Indoor; Indoor e outdoor; Outdoor; Altro
zh-CN: 手球场地: 沙滩; 室内; 室内和室外; 室外; 其他
ja: ハンドボールプレー面: ビーチ; 屋内; 屋内/屋外両用; 屋外; その他
en: Handball playing surface: Beach; Indoor; Indoor and outdoor; Outdoor; Other
fi: Käsipallon pelialusta: Ranta; Sisä; Sisä ja ulko; Ulko; Muu
zh-TW: 手球適用場地表面: 沙灘; 室內; 室內與室外; 室外; 其他
ru: Игровая поверхность для гандбола: Пляж; В помещении; В помещении и на улице; На улице; Другое
ko: 핸드볼 경기장 표면: 비치; 실내; 실내 및 실외; 실외; 기타
es: Superficie de juego de balonmano: Playa; Interiores; Interiores y exteriores; Exteriores; Otra
pl: Nawierzchnia gry piłki ręcznej: Plaża; Hala; Hala i otwarty teren; Otwarty teren; Inne
lt-LT: Rankinio žaidimo paviršius: Paplūdimio; Vidaus; Vidaus ir lauko; Lauko; Kita
cs: Házenkářská hrací plocha: Pláž; Hala; Hala a venkovní povrch; Venkovní povrch; Jiný
de: Spielfläche des Handballs: Beach; Halle; Halle und Feld; Feld; Sonstige
fr: Surface de jeu du handball: Plage; Intérieur; Intérieur et extérieur; Extérieur; Autre
nb: Håndballbane: Strand; Innendørs; Innendørs og utendørs; Utendørs; Annet